Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2276.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin TRANSFER AND APPROPRIATION; MINNESOTA HOMELESS STUDY.new text end new text begin (a) $900,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $900,000 in fiscal year 2027 are transferred from the general fund to the housing development fund. This transfer is $900,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each year thereafter. new text end new text begin (b) $900,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $900,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the housing development fund to the commissioner of the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency for a grant to the Amherst H. Wilder Foundation for the Minnesota homeless study. This appropriation must be disbursed to the Amherst H. Wilder Foundation no later than July 15 of each year and used for activities directly related to the triennial Minnesota homeless study. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, the commissioner may use up to one percent of this appropriation for administrative costs. new text end new text begin (c) The Amherst H. Wilder Foundation must submit a copy of the Minnesota homeless study and a report that summarizes the findings of the study to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over housing and homelessness by March 1, 2028, and every three years thereafter. new text end new text begin (d) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, any unencumbered balance in fiscal year 2026 does not cancel and is available in fiscal year 2027. new text end